Utah statutes.
41-1a-608.   Release by lienholder to owner.

(1)  A person holding a lien or encumbrance as shown upon a certificate of title upon a vehicle or vessel may release the lien or encumbrance or assign his interest to the owner without affecting the registration of the vehicle or vessel.

(2)  The division shall issue a new certificate of title without a lien previously recorded upon receiving:

(a)  a certificate of title:

(i)  upon which a lienholder has released or assigned his interest to the owner; or

(ii)  not so endorsed but accompanied by a legal release from a lienholder of his interest in or to a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor;

(b)  an application properly completed; and

(c)  the proper fee.

